Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 16.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-116
Service of process.

(ULLCA 116) (a) An agent for service of
process appointed by a limited liability company or foreign limited liability
company is an agent of the company for service of any process, notice, or
demand required or permitted by law to be served on the company.

(b) If a limited liability
company or foreign limited liability company does not appoint or maintain
an agent for service of process in this state or the agent for service of
process cannot with reasonable diligence be found at the agent's street address,
service of any process, notice, or demand on the limited liability company
or foreign limited liability company may be made by registered or certified
mail, return receipt requested, to the company at its designated office.

(c) Service is effected
under subsection (b) of this section at the earliest of:

(1) the date the limited
liability company or foreign limited liability company receives the process,
notice, or demand;

(2)
the date shown on the return receipt, if signed on behalf of the company;
or

(3)
five days after the process, notice, or demand is deposited with the United
States Postal Service, if correctly addressed and with sufficient postage.

(d) This section does
not affect the right to serve process, notice, or demand in any other manner
provided by law.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 16.